Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1604
Accruals, defined.

Accruals shall mean funds to cover all expected claims, reserves, and expenses to operate the self-funded portion of the employee benefit plan for a plan year.

Laws 1991, LB 167, § 4.